Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.120

Tribal warrants—Other warrants. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

A tribal arrest warrant under chapter 207, Laws of 2024 is not required to be given prioritization above other warrants.

[ 2024 c 207 s 13.]